Idaho, session 2025, H0482.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to the appropriation made in Section 1, Chap-
ter 81, Laws of 2024, and any other appropriation provided by law, there is
hereby appropriated to the Military Division for the Military Management
Program $200,000 from the General Fund, to be expended for trustee and bene-
fit payments, for the period July 1, 2024, through June 30, 2025.
SECTION 2. CASH TRANSFERS FROM THE BUDGET STABILIZATION FUND IN FIS-
CAL YEARS 2025 AND 2026. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 57-814,
Idaho Code, which limits the allowable balance in the Budget Stabilization
Fund to fifteen percent of total General Fund receipts for the fiscal year
just ending and requires the Office of the State Controller to transfer
excess moneys in the Budget Stabilization Fund back to the General Fund,
and any other provision of law to the contrary, the Office of the State Con-
troller shall not transfer funds from the Budget Stabilization Fund to the
General Fund for the period June 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 3. CASH TRANSFER FROM BOND LEVY EQUALIZATION TO THE GENERAL
FUND. There is hereby appropriated and the Office of the State Controller
shall transfer the remaining balance in the Bond Levy Equalization Fund to
the General Fund as soon as practicable for the period July 1, 2024, through
June 30, 2025.
SECTION 4. CASH TRANSFER FROM THE CONSTITUTIONAL DEFENSE FUND TO THE
LEGISLATIVE LEGAL DEFENSE FUND. There is hereby appropriated and the Office
of the State Controller shall transfer the remaining balance in the Consti-
tutional Defense Fund to the Legislative Legal Defense Fund as soon as prac-
ticable for the period July 1, 2024, through June 30, 2025.
SECTION 5. GOVERNOR'S EMERGENCY FUND. There is hereby appropriated and
the Office of the State Controller shall transfer the remaining balance in


the Governor's Emergency Fund to the General Fund as soon as practicable for
the period July 1, 2024, through June 30, 2025.
SECTION 6. There is hereby appropriated and the Office of the State
Controller shall transfer $330,000,000 from the General Fund to the Public
School Income Fund on July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as practicable for
the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 7. SALARY INCREASES IN ACCORDANCE WITH FEDERAL GENERAL SCHED-
ULE PAY SCALE. Notwithstanding Section 14 of Senate Bill No. 1110, as
enacted by the First Regular Session of the Sixty-eighth Idaho Legislature,
the Military Division shall implement fiscal year 2026 salary increases
to maintain parity with the federal General Schedule pay scale for those
employees within the National Guard Administration compensation schedule
pursuant to the provisions of Section 59-1603, Idaho Code, and Chapter 53,
Title 67, Idaho Code. The Military Division shall implement fiscal year 2026
pay increases pursuant to the conditions, limitations, and restrictions
provided in Section 14 of Senate Bill No. 1110, as enacted by the First Regu-
lar Session of the Sixty-eighth Idaho Legislature, for employees outside of
the National Guard Administration compensation schedule.
SECTION 8. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Sections 1 through 5 of this act shall be in full force
and effect on and after passage and approval, and Sections 6 and 7 of this act
shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 2025.